test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_O_NoExtra_abwaanaak_gt-norm.yaml
     +Px1abwaanaak+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: niabwaanaakiminiibanag
     +Px1abwaanaak+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: niabwaanaakiminiibaning
     +Px1abwaanaak+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: niabwaanaakimini***idig, idog***an
     +Px1abwaanaak+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: niabwaanaakimini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1abwaanaak+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: niabwaanaakimini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: giabwaanaakiminaanibanan
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: giabwaanaakiminaanibanag
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: giabwaanaakiminaanibaning
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: giabwaanaakiminaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: giabwaanaakiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: giabwaanaakiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: giabwaanaakimiwaaibanan
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: giabwaanaakimiwaaibanag
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: giabwaanaakimiwaaibaning
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: giabwaanaakimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: giabwaanaakimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: giabwaanaakimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: giabwaanaakiminiibanan
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: giabwaanaakiminiibanag
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: giabwaanaakiminiibaning
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: giabwaanaakimini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: giabwaanaakimini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: giabwaanaakimini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: oabwaanaakiminaanibanan
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: oabwaanaakiminaanibanag
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: oabwaanaakiminaanibaning
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: oabwaanaakiminaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: oabwaanaakiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: oabwaanaakiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: oabwaanaakimiwaaibanan
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: oabwaanaakimiwaaibanag
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: oabwaanaakimiwaaibaning
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: oabwaanaakimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: oabwaanaakimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: oabwaanaakimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: oabwaanaakiminiibanan
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: oabwaanaakiminiibanag
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: oabwaanaakiminiibaning
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: oabwaanaakimini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: oabwaanaakimini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: oabwaanaakimini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6, 7
     +Px1abwaanaak+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: niabwaanaakishinaanibanan
     +Px1abwaanaak+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: niabwaanaakishinaanibanag
     +Px1abwaanaak+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: niabwaanaakishinaanibaning
     +Px1abwaanaak+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: niabwaanaakishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px1abwaanaak+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: niabwaanaakishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1abwaanaak+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: niabwaanaakishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1abwaanaak+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: niabwaanaakishiwaaibanan
     +Px1abwaanaak+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: niabwaanaakishiwaaibanag
     +Px1abwaanaak+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: niabwaanaakishiwaaibaning
     +Px1abwaanaak+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: niabwaanaakishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px1abwaanaak+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: niabwaanaakishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1abwaanaak+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: niabwaanaakishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1abwaanaak+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: niabwaanaakishiniibanan
     +Px1abwaanaak+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: niabwaanaakishiniibanag
     +Px1abwaanaak+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: niabwaanaakishiniibaning
     +Px1abwaanaak+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: niabwaanaakishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px1abwaanaak+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: niabwaanaakishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1abwaanaak+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: niabwaanaakishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: giabwaanaakishinaanibanan
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: giabwaanaakishinaanibanag
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: giabwaanaakishinaanibaning
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: giabwaanaakishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: giabwaanaakishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: giabwaanaakishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: giabwaanaakishiwaaibanan
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: giabwaanaakishiwaaibanag
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: giabwaanaakishiwaaibaning
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: giabwaanaakishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: giabwaanaakishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: giabwaanaakishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: giabwaanaakishiniibanan
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: giabwaanaakishiniibanag
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: giabwaanaakishiniibaning
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: giabwaanaakishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: giabwaanaakishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: giabwaanaakishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: oabwaanaakishinaanibanan
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: oabwaanaakishinaanibanag
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: oabwaanaakishinaanibaning
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: oabwaanaakishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: oabwaanaakishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: oabwaanaakishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: oabwaanaakishiwaaibanan
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: oabwaanaakishiwaaibanag
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: oabwaanaakishiwaaibaning
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: oabwaanaakishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: oabwaanaakishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: oabwaanaakishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: oabwaanaakishiniibanan
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: oabwaanaakishiniibanag
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: oabwaanaakishiniibaning
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: oabwaanaakishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: oabwaanaakishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: oabwaanaakishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: abwaanaakensimishinaaniban
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: abwaanaakensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: abwaanaakensimishiwaaiban
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: abwaanaakensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: abwaanaakensimishiniiban
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: abwaanaakensimishini***idig, idog***
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: abwaanaakenhimishinaaniban
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: abwaanaakenhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: abwaanaakenhimishiwaaiban
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: abwaanaakenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: abwaanaakenhimishiniiban
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: abwaanaakenhimishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 7
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: abwaanaakensimishinaanan
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: abwaanaakensimishinaanag
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: abwaanaakensimishinaaning
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: abwaanaakensimishiwaaan
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: abwaanaakensimishiwaaag
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: abwaanaakensimishiwaaing
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: abwaanaakensimishinian
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: abwaanaakensimishiniag
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: abwaanaakensimishiniing
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: abwaanaakenhimishinaanan
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: abwaanaakenhimishinaanag
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: abwaanaakenhimishinaaning
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: abwaanaakenhimishiwaaan
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: abwaanaakenhimishiwaaag
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: abwaanaakenhimishiwaaing
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: abwaanaakenhimishinian
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: abwaanaakenhimishiniag
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: abwaanaakenhimishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 6, 7
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: abwaanaakensimishibanan
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: abwaanaakensimishibanag
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: abwaanaakensimishibaning
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: abwaanaakensimish***idig, idog***an
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: abwaanaakensimish***idig, idog***ag
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: abwaanaakensimish***idig, idog***ing
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: abwaanaakenhimishibanan
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: abwaanaakenhimishibanag
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: abwaanaakenhimishibaning
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: abwaanaakenhimish***idig, idog***an
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: abwaanaakenhimish***idig, idog***ag
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: abwaanaakenhimish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 6, 7
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: abwaanaakensiminaanibanan
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: abwaanaakensiminaanibanag
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: abwaanaakensiminaanibaning
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: abwaanaakensiminaan***idig, idog***an
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: abwaanaakensiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: abwaanaakensiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: abwaanaakensimiwaaibanan
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: abwaanaakensimiwaaibanag
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: abwaanaakensimiwaaibaning
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: abwaanaakensimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: abwaanaakensimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: abwaanaakensimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: abwaanaakensiminiibanan
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: abwaanaakensiminiibanag
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: abwaanaakensiminiibaning
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: abwaanaakensimini***idig, idog***an
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: abwaanaakensimini***idig, idog***ag
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: abwaanaakensimini***idig, idog***ing
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: abwaanaakenhiminaanibanan
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: abwaanaakenhiminaanibanag
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: abwaanaakenhiminaanibaning
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: abwaanaakenhiminaan***idig, idog***an
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: abwaanaakenhiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: abwaanaakenhiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: abwaanaakenhimiwaaibanan
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: abwaanaakenhimiwaaibanag
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: abwaanaakenhimiwaaibaning
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: abwaanaakenhimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: abwaanaakenhimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: abwaanaakenhimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: abwaanaakenhiminiibanan
